Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-709
Property assessment
division; annual report; powers and duties.

The
property assessment division of the Department of Revenue shall publish an
annual report detailing property tax valuations, taxes levied, and property
tax rates throughout the state. The annual report shall display information
by political subdivision and by property type within each county and also
include statewide summarizations. The
department shall submit the report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature. The
department may charge a fee for copies of the annual report. The Tax Commissioner
shall set the fee, based on the reasonable cost of production.

Laws 2001, LB 170, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 47;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 30.